Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska27-102
Rule 102. Purpose and construction.

These rules shall be construed to secure fairness in administration, elimination of unjustifiable expense and delay, and promotion of growth and development of the law of evidence to the end that the truth may be ascertained and proceedings justly determined.

Laws 1975, LB 279, § 2.

Requiring a renewed objection in the case of a motion in limine, including a motion to redact, is consistent with the principles of “fairness in administration,” discovery of truth, and just determination identified in this section. State v. Huston, 285 Neb. 11, 824 N.W.2d 724 (2013).

Ruling on admissibility of evidence are discretionary with the trial judge. State v. King, 197 Neb. 729, 250 N.W.2d 655 (1977).